Utah statutes.
63C-13-104.   Authority duties.

(1)  The authority shall:

(a)  prepare and issue requests inviting interested persons to submit proposals regarding the fulfillment of a prison relocation project;

(b)  receive and evaluate any proposals received in response to a request under Subsection (1)(a);

(c)  review and evaluate any proposals relating to a prison relocation project that the executive branch submits; and

(d)  complete its review and evaluation of proposals within 90 days after receiving proposals.

(2) (a)  Upon completing its evaluation of proposals submitted concerning a prison relocation project, the authority shall report the results of its evaluation and any recommendations to the governor and the Legislative Management Committee.

(b)  The process of the authority's issuing requests and reviewing and evaluating proposals is to provide a public forum for considering the feasibility of and proposals for a prison relocation project.

(c)  The authority's recommendations under Subsection (2)(a) are advisory only.

(3) (a)  The acceptance of a proposal and any implementation of a proposal for a prison relocation project are subject to legislative approval.

(b)  The state may not sell, exchange, or lease the land on which the state prison is located without the Legislature's prior approval.

